Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.845

Postretirement cost-of-living allowance.

Retirement allowances paid under the defined benefit portion of plan 3 shall have a postretirement cost-of-living allowance calculated and paid as provided in RCW 41.32.770.

[ 1995 c 239 s 107.]

NOTES:

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.